Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2582.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 41.08.050 and 1987 c 339 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:((The classified civil service and provisions of this chapter shall include all full paid employees of the fire department of each city, town or municipality coming within its purview, except that individuals appointed as fire chief after July 1, 1987, may be excluded by the legislative body of the city, town, or municipality.))(1) For fire departments with fewer than six firefighters, including the fire chief, the classified civil service provisions of this chapter include all full paid employees of the department of the city, town, or municipality.(2) For fire departments with six or more firefighters, including the fire chief, the legislative body of a city, town, or municipality may exempt from civil service individuals appointed as fire chief after July 1, 1987.(a) If the fire chief is not exempt, the classified civil service includes all full paid employees of the department of the city, town, or municipality, including the fire chief.(b) If the fire chief is exempt, the classified civil service includes all full paid employees of the department of the city, town, or municipality, except the fire chief and an additional number of positions, designated the unclassified service, determined as follows:Department PersonnelUnclassifiedPosition Appointments6 through 10211 through 20321 through 50451 through 1005101 through 2506251 through 5008501 and over10(3) The unclassified position appointments authorized by subsection (2)(b) of this section may only include selections from the following positions up to the limit of the number of positions authorized: Assistant chief, deputy chief, division chief, and administrative assistant or administrative secretary. The initial selection of specific positions to be in the unclassified service and exempt from civil service shall be made by the fire chief, who shall notify the civil service commission of his or her selection. Subsequent changes in the designation of which positions are in the unclassified service may be made only with the concurrence of the fire chief, the mayor or the city administrator, and the civil service commission, and then only after the civil service commission has heard the issue in an open meeting. If a position initially selected by the fire chief to be in the unclassified service is in the classified civil service at the time of the selection, and if the position is occupied, the employee occupying the position has the right to return to the next highest position or a like position in the classified civil service.(4) All appointments to and promotions in said department shall be made solely on merit, efficiency and fitness, which shall be ascertained by open competitive examination and impartial investigation. No person shall be reinstated in, or transferred, suspended or discharged from any such place, position or employment contrary to the provisions of this chapter.--- END ---